Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 20 Property Exempt from Execution or Attachment
§ 1-20-110.
Exemption
for retirement funds and accounts.

The following are exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment or any other legal process:

The interest of an individual or beneficiary in a retirement plan;

and (B) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 108, § 2.

Money or other assets payable to an individual from a retirement plan;

The interest of a beneficiary in a retirement plan if the beneficiary acquired the interest as the result of the death of an individual. The beneficiary’s interest is exempt to the same extent that the individual’s interest was exempt immediately before the death of the individual;

All property in this state of the judgment debtor where the judgment is in favor of any state or any political subdivision of any state for failure to pay that state’s or political subdivision’s income tax on benefits received from a pension or other retirement plan. This paragraph shall apply only to judgments obtained after the judgment debtor has established residency in Wyoming and has been domiciled in Wyoming for at least one hundred eighty (180) days; and

Money or other assets payable to a beneficiary from a retirement plan if the beneficiary acquired the money or other assets as the result of the death of an individual. The beneficiary’s interest is exempt to the same extent that the individual’s interest in the money or other assets was exempt immediately before the death of the individual.

The exemptions in subsection (a) of this section do not apply to a contribution made by an individual to a retirement plan within ninety (90) days before the individual files for bankruptcy.

Any fund, plan or account specified in subsection (a) of this section is not exempt from the claim of an alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order. However, the interest of an alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order is exempt from all claims of any creditor of the alternate payee.

As used in this section:

“Alternate payee” means any spouse, former spouse, child or other dependent of an individual who is recognized by a domestic relations order as having a right to receive all, or a portion of, the benefits payable under a retirement plan with respect to such individual;

“Beneficiary” includes a person, trust or trustee who has, before or after the death of an individual, a direct or indirect beneficial interest in a retirement plan;

“Beneficial interest” includes an interest that is acquired:

As a designated beneficiary, survivor, co-annuitant, heir or legatee; or

If excludable from gross income under the Internal Revenue Code as:

A rollover under 26 U.S.C. section 408 or 408A;

A distribution from one (1) retirement plan to another retirement plan;

A distribution under 26 U.S.C section 402 if the distributed amount is contributed to another retirement plan within sixty (60) days of the distribution; or

A distribution that is legally similar to a distribution under subdivision (I), (II) or (III) of this subparagraph.

“Individual” means a participant in, owner of or alternative payee of a retirement plan;

“Qualified domestic relations order” means as that term is defined by 26 U.S.C. section 414(p);

“Retirement plan” means a plan, account or annuity that is qualified under 26 U.S.C. section 401, 403, 408, 408A, 409, 414 or 457 as amended.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 190, § 1; 1990, ch. 27, § 1; 1993, ch. 62, § 1; 1996, ch. 43, § 1; 1998, ch. 42, § 1; 2012, ch. 69, § 1; 2015 ch. 108, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(iii), inserted “including individual retirement accounts (IRAs)
Roth individual retirement accounts (Roth IRAs) and simplified employee pension individual retirement accounts (SEP IRAs).”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “legal process” for “process: issued by any court”; rewrote the introductory language of (a)(i); repealed (a)(i)(A) and (a)(i)(B); rewrote (a)(ii) and (a)(iii); added (a)(v), and (b) through (d); and made related changes.

IRA funded by individual is not entitled to exemption under this section,

nor is the classification created by this section violative of art. I, § 34, Wyo. Const. (uniform operation of general law). Kingston v. Honeycutt, 908 P.2d 976,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1995).

Bankruptcy cases. —

Unpublished decision:

Although unemployment compensation and benefits paid from an employer's retirement plan were exempt under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

27-3-319

and

1-20-110

, the taxes withheld from this income and refunded to the Chapter 7 debtor were not exempt. The taxes were withheld under 26 U.S.C.S. §§ 3402(p)(2) and 3405(c), and under § 3402(a)(1) were deemed to be a “tax.”
2011 Bankr. LEXIS 1631.

Cited

in

Wood v. Wood, 964 P.2d 1259,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of anti-alienation provisions of Employee Retirement Income
Security Act (29 USCS § 1056(d)) (ERISA) on rights of judgment creditors,
131 ALR Fed 427.

§ 1-20-111.
Exemption for contributions to a medical savings account.

Contributions by an individual
to a qualified medical savings account are exempt from execution,
attachment, garnishment or any other process issued by any court,
except for judgments against an individual or other dependents for
medical expenses, to the extent the contributions are allowable as
a deduction under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 186, § 1.